North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 7A. Registration of Voters.

§ 163-82.1.
General principles of voter registration.

Prerequisite to Voting. — No person shall be permitted to vote who has not been registered under the provisions of this Article or registered as previously provided by law.

County Board’s Duty to Register. — A county board of elections shall register, in accordance with this Article, every person qualified to vote in that county who makes an application in accordance with this Article.

Permanent Registration. — Every person registered to vote by a county board of elections in accordance with this Article shall remain registered until:

The registrant requests in writing to the county board of elections to be removed from the list of registered voters; or

The registrant becomes disqualified through death, conviction of a felony, or removal out of the county; or

The county board of elections determines, through the procedure outlined in

G.S. 163-82.14

, that it can no longer confirm where the voter resides.

History.
1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; 1963, c. 303, s. 1; 1965, c. 1116, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 25; 1975, c. 395; 1981, c. 39, s. 1; c. 87, s. 1; c. 308, s. 1; 1985, c. 211, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c.
762, s. 2; 2009-541, s. 7(a); 2013-381, s. 12.1(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.1. General principles of voter registration

Prerequisite to Voting. — No person shall be permitted to vote who has not been registered under the provisions of this Article or registered as previously provided by law.

County Board’s Duty to Register. — A county board of elections shall register, in accordance with this Article, every person qualified to vote in that county who makes an application in accordance with this Article.

Permanent Registration. — Every person registered to vote by a county board of elections in accordance with this Article shall remain registered until:

The registrant requests in writing to the county board of elections to be removed from the list of registered voters; or

The registrant becomes disqualified through death, conviction of a felony, or removal out of the county; or

The county board of elections determines, through the procedure outlined in

G.S. 163-82.14

, that it can no longer confirm where the voter resides.

Preregistration. — A person who is at least 16 years of age but will not be 18 years of age by the date of the next election and who is otherwise qualified to register may preregister to vote and shall be automatically registered upon reaching the age
of eligibility following verification of the person’s qualifications and address in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.7

.

§ 163-82.2.
Chief State Election Official.

The Executive Director of the State Board of Elections is the “Chief State Election Official” of North Carolina for purposes of P.L. 103-31, The National Voter Registration Act of 1993, subsequently referred to in this Article as the “National Voter Registration
Act”. As such the Executive Director is responsible for coordination of State responsibilities under the National Voter Registration Act.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2001-319, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.3.
Voter registration application forms.

Form Developed by State Board of Elections. — The State Board of Elections shall develop an application form for voter registration. Any person may use the form to apply to do any of the following:

Register to vote.

Change party affiliation or unaffiliated status.

Report a change of address within a county.

Report a change of name.The county board of elections for the county where the applicant resides shall accept the form as application for any of those purposes if the form is submitted as set out in

G.S. 163-82.3

.

Interstate Form. — The county board of elections where an applicant resides shall accept as application for any of the purposes set out in subsection (a) of this section the interstate registration form designed by the Federal Election Commission pursuant
to section 9 of the National Voter Registration Act, if the interstate form is submitted in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.6

.

Agency Application Form. — The county board of elections where an applicant resides shall accept as application for any of the purposes set out in subsection (a) of this section a form developed pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.19

or

G.S. 163-82.20

.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 18(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2009-541, s. 8(a); 2013-381, s. 12.1(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.3. Voter registration application forms

Form Developed by State Board of Elections. — The State Board of Elections shall develop an application form for voter registration. Any person may use the form to apply to do any of the following:

Register to vote.

Change party affiliation or unaffiliated status.

Report a change of address within a county.

Report a change of name.

Preregister to vote.

Interstate Form. — The county board of elections where an applicant resides shall accept as application for any of the purposes set out in subsection (a) of this section the interstate registration form designed by the Federal Election Commission pursuant
to section 9 of the National Voter Registration Act, if the interstate form is submitted in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.6

.

Agency Application Form. — The county board of elections where an applicant resides shall accept as application for any of the purposes set out in subsection (a) of this section a form developed pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.19

or

G.S. 163-82.20

.

The county board of elections for the county where the applicant resides shall accept the form as application for any of those purposes if the form is submitted as set out in

G.S. 163-82.3

.

§ 163-82.4.
Contents of application form.

Information Requested of Applicant. — The form required by G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall request the applicant’s:

Name,

Date of birth,

Residence address,

County of residence,

Date of application,

Gender,

Race,

Ethnicity,

Political party affiliation, if any, in accordance with subsection (d) of this section,

Telephone number (to assist the county board of elections in contacting the voter if needed in processing the application),

Drivers license number or, if the applicant does not have a drivers license number, the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number,

and any other information the State Board finds is necessary to enable officials of the county where the person resides to satisfactorily process the application. The form shall require the applicant to state whether currently registered to vote anywhere,
and at what address, so that any prior registration can be cancelled. The portions of the form concerning race and ethnicity shall include as a choice any category shown by the most recent decennial federal census to
compose at least one percent (1%) of the total population of North Carolina. The county board shall make a diligent effort to complete for the registration records any information requested on the form that the applicant
does not complete, but no application shall be denied because an applicant does not state race, ethnicity, gender, or telephone number. The application shall conspicuously state that provision of the applicant’s telephone
number is optional. If the county board maintains voter records on computer, the free list provided under this subsection shall include telephone numbers if the county board enters the telephone number into its computer
records of voters.

No Drivers License or Social Security Number Issued. — The State Board shall assign a unique identifier number to an applicant for voter registration if the applicant has not been issued either a current and valid drivers license or a social security
number. That unique identifier number shall serve to identify that applicant for voter registration purposes.

Notice of Requirements, Attestation, Notice of Penalty, and Notice of Confidentiality. — The form required by G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall contain, in uniform type, the following:

A statement that specifies each eligibility requirement (including citizenship) and an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement, with a requirement for the signature of the applicant, under penalty of a Class I felony under G.S. 163-275(13).

A statement that, if the applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

A statement that, if the applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

Party Affiliation or Unaffiliated Status. — The application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall provide a place for the applicant to state a preference to be affiliated with one of the political parties in

G.S. 163-96

, or a preference to be an “unaffiliated” voter. Every person who applies to register shall state his preference. If the applicant fails to declare a preference for a party or for unaffiliated status, that person
shall be listed as “unaffiliated”, except that if the person is already registered to vote in the county and that person’s registration already contains a party affiliation, the county board shall not change the registrant’s status
to “unaffiliated” unless the registrant clearly indicates a desire in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.17

for such a change. An unaffiliated registrant shall not be eligible to vote in any political party primary, except as provided in

G.S. 163-119

, but may vote in any other primary or general election. The application form shall so state.

Citizenship and Age Questions. — Voter registration application forms shall include all of the following:

The following question and statement:

“Are you a citizen of the United States of America?” and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United States.

“If you checked ‘no’ in response to this question, do not submit this form.”

The following question and statement:

“Will you be 18 years of age on or before election day?” and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on election day.

“If you checked ‘no’ in response to this question, do not submit this form.”

Correcting Registration Forms. — If the voter fails to complete any required item on the voter registration form but provides enough information on the form to enable the county board of elections to identify and contact the voter, the voter shall be
notified of the omission and given the opportunity to complete the form at least by 5:00 P.M. on the day before the county canvass as set in G.S. 163-182.5(b). If the voter corrects that omission within that time and is determined
by the county board of elections to be eligible to vote, the board shall permit the voter to vote. If the information is not corrected by election day, the voter shall be allowed to vote a provisional official ballot. If the correct
information is provided to the county board of elections by at least 5:00 P.M. on the day before the county canvass, the board shall count any portion of the provisional official ballot that the voter is eligible to vote.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 12; Rev., s. 4319; C.S., s. 5940; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 93; 1933, c. 165, s. 5; 1951, c. 984, s. 1; 1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; c. 871, s. 2; 1957, c. 784, s. 2; 1963, c. 303, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1971,
c. 1166, s. 6; 1973, c. 793, s. 27; c. 1223, s. 3; 1975, c. 234, s. 2; 1979, c. 135, s. 1; c. 539, ss. 1-3; c. 797, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 222; c. 308, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 18(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess.,
1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1999-424, s. 7(c), (d); 1999-453, s. 8(a); 2003-226, s. 9; 2004-127, s. 4; 2005-428, s. 15; 2007-391, s. 20; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 9(a); 2013-381, s. 12.1(c); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.4. Contents of application form.

Information Requested of Applicant. — The form required by G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall request the applicant’s:

Name,

Date of birth,

Residence address,

County of residence,

Date of application,

Gender,

Race,

Political party affiliation, if any, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section,

Telephone number (to assist the county board of elections in contacting the voter if needed in processing the application),

Drivers license number or, if the applicant does not have a drivers license number, the last four digits of the applicant’s social security number,

Notice of Requirements, Attestation, Notice of Penalty, and Notice of Confidentiality. — The form required by G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall contain, in uniform type, the following:

A statement that specifies each eligibility requirement (including citizenship) and an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement, with a requirement for the signature of the applicant, under penalty of a Class I felony under G.S. 163-275(13).

A statement that, if the applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

A statement that, if the applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

Party Affiliation or Unaffiliated Status. — The application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) shall provide a place for the applicant to state a preference to be affiliated with one of the political parties in

G.S. 163-96

, or a preference to be an “unaffiliated” voter. Every person who applies to register shall state his preference. If the applicant fails to declare a preference for a party or for unaffiliated status, that person
shall be listed as “unaffiliated”, except that if the person is already registered to vote in the county and that person’s registration already contains a party affiliation, the county board shall not change the registrant’s status
to “unaffiliated” unless the registrant clearly indicates a desire in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.17

for such a change. An unaffiliated registrant shall not be eligible to vote in any political party primary, except as provided in

G.S. 163-119

, but may vote in any other primary or general election. The application form shall so state.

Citizenship and Age Questions. — Voter registration application forms shall include all of the following:

The following question and statement:

“Are you a citizen of the United States of America?” and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United States.

“If you checked ’no’ in response to this question, do not submit this form.

The following questions and statement:

“Will you be 18 years of age on or before election day?” and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on election day.

“Are you at least 16 years of age and understand that you must be 18 years of age on or before election day to vote?” and boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant is at least 16 years of age and understands that the applicant
must be at least 18 years of age or older by election day to vote.

“If you checked ‘no’ in response to both of these questions, do not submit this form.”

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-541, s. 9(a), effective January 1, 2010.

Correcting Registration Forms. — If the voter fails to complete any required item on the voter registration form but provides enough information on the form to enable the county board of elections to identify and contact the voter, the voter shall be
notified of the omission and given the opportunity to complete the form at least by 5:00 P.M. on the day before the county canvass as set in G.S. 163-182.5(b). If the voter corrects that omission within that time and is determined
by the county board of elections to be eligible to vote, the board shall permit the voter to vote. If the information is not corrected by election day, the voter shall be allowed to vote a provisional official ballot. If the correct
information is provided to the county board of elections by at least 5:00 P.M. on the day before the county canvass, the board shall count any portion of the provisional official ballot that the voter is eligible to vote.

(7a) Ethnicity,

and any other information the State Board finds is necessary to enable officials of the county where the person resides to satisfactorily process the application. The form shall require the applicant to state whether currently registered to vote anywhere,
and at what address, so that any prior registration can be cancelled. The portions of the form concerning race and ethnicity shall include as a choice any category shown by the most recent decennial federal census to compose at least
one percent (1%) of the total population of North Carolina. The county board shall make a diligent effort to complete for the registration records any information requested on the form that the applicant does not complete, but no application
shall be denied because an applicant does not state race, ethnicity, gender, or telephone number. The application shall conspicuously state that provision of the applicant’s telephone number is optional. If the county board maintains
voter records on computer, the free list provided under this subsection shall include telephone numbers if the county board enters the telephone number into its computer records of voters.

(a1) No Drivers License or Social Security Number Issued. — The State Board shall assign a unique identifier number to an applicant for voter registration if the applicant has not been issued either a current and valid drivers license or a social security
number. That unique identifier number shall serve to identify that applicant for voter registration purposes.

§ 163-82.5.
Distribution of application forms.

The State Board of Elections shall make the forms described in

G.S. 163-82.3

available for distribution through governmental and private entities, with particular emphasis on making them available for organized voter registration drives.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 18(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).